Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5844.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Director" means the director of the agency. (b) "Fund" means the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund created in section 5. (c) "Michigan veterans affairs agency" or "agency" means the agency created by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92. (d) "National Cemetery Administration" or "NCA" means the National Cemetery Administration in the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. (e) "Upper Peninsula" means the Upper Peninsula of this state. Sec. 3. (1) The Michigan veterans affairs agency shall conduct a comprehensive location analysis and feasibility study to determine the best location for a state veterans cemetery in the Upper Peninsula. The primary goal of the location analysis and feasibility study is to identify a site that maximizes eligibility for federal funding for construction, establishment, and per-interment reimbursement under programs administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. (2) The location analysis must consider suitability factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Demographics and market analysis. (b) Traffic patterns and accessibility. (c) Competitive and regional service landscape. (d) Site economics and costs. (e) Infrastructure and site characteristics. (f) Economic, legal, and regulatory environment. (3) The feasibility study must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Project description. (b) Market feasibility. (c) Technical feasibility. (d) Operational and organizational feasibility. (e) Financial feasibility. (f) Legal and environmental feasibility. (g) Risk assessment. (4) On completion of the location analysis and feasibility study, the agency shall consult with the National Cemetery Administration to ensure the proposed cemetery site, design, and operational plan meet all federal standards required for eligibility for federal construction grants and per-interment reimbursement under 38 USC 2303 and 2408. The agency shall submit all required documentation to the NCA for review, placement on the federal priority list, and consideration for federal grant funding. Sec. 4. (1) Based on the location analysis and feasibility study conducted under section 3, the agency may acquire or purchase land or an interest in land in the Upper Peninsula that is suitable for a veterans cemetery or designate state-owned land under its jurisdiction as a veterans cemetery. (2) The director shall apply for and accept all grants available under 38 USC 2408 and per-interment reimbursements available under 38 USC 2303. Sec. 5. (1) The Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from appropriations or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The agency is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (5) The agency shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes relating to the establishment and operation of a veterans cemetery in the Upper Peninsula: (a) For architectural design or engineering plans, or both, and any necessary environmental impact studies prescribed by law. (b) For necessary expenses to qualify for federal grants under 38 USC 2408 or per-interment reimbursement under 38 USC 2303. (c) To prepare land that is acquired or purchased for a veterans cemetery or designated as a veterans cemetery for operational use. (d) For ongoing expenses related to the operation of a veterans cemetery. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04511'25) or House Bill No. 5843 (request no. H04511'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. The legislature finds that this amendatory act is a matter of statewide concern and interest, as it encourages the availability of veterans cemeteries throughout this state.